Maryland, session 2026, HB0961.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–433.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “ATHLETIC OFFICIAL” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO OFFICIATES A
SPORTS CONTEST FOR COMPENSATION OR AS A VOLUNTEER.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0961*

HOUSE BILL 961
[(2)] (3) “Concussion” means a traumatic injury to the brain causing an
immediate and, usually, short–lived change in mental status or an alteration of normal
consciousness resulting from:
(i) A fall;
(ii) A violent blow to the head or body; or
(iii) The shaking or spinning of the head or body.
[(3)] (4) “Youth sports program” means a program organized for
recreational athletic competition or instruction for participants who are under the age of
19 years.
(b) (1) The Department shall develop policies and implement a program to
provide awareness to ATHLETIC OFFICIALS, coaches, school personnel, students, and the
parents or guardians of students, in collaboration with the Maryland Department of
Health, each county board, the Maryland Public Secondary Schools Athletic Association,
the Maryland Athletic Trainers’ Association, the Brain Injury Association of Maryland, and
representatives of licensed health care providers who treat concussions, on:
(i) The nature and risk of a concussion or head injury;
(ii) The criteria for removal from and return to play ESTABLISHED
UNDER THIS SECTION;
(iii) The risks of not reporting injury and continuing to play; and
(iv) Appropriate academic accommodations for students diagnosed as
having sustained a concussion or head injury.
(2) The program shall include a process to verify that [a coach has]
ATHLETIC OFFICIALS AND COACHES HAVE received information on the program
developed under paragraph (1) of this subsection.
(3) (i) Before a student enrolled in a public school system in the State
may participate in an authorized interscholastic athletic activity, the county board shall
provide a concussion and head injury information sheet to the student and a parent or
guardian of the student.
(ii) The student and the parent or guardian of the student shall sign
a statement acknowledging receipt of the information sheet.
(iii) The Department shall create the information sheet and
acknowledgment statement required under this paragraph.

HOUSE BILL 961 3
(4) The Department may use materials available from the Centers for
Disease Control and Prevention, the Brain Injury Association of Maryland, or any other
appropriate entity to carry out the requirements of this subsection.
(c) (1) A student who is suspected of sustaining a concussion or other head
injury in a practice or game shall be removed from play at that time.
(2) A student who has been removed from play may not return to play until
the student has obtained written clearance from a licensed health care provider trained in
the evaluation and management of concussions.
(D) (1) THE FOLLOWING INDIVIDUALS MAY IMMEDIATELY REMOVE A
STUDENT FROM PLAY IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (C)(1) OF THIS SECTION
OR PREVENT A STUDENT FROM RETURNING TO PLAY IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SUBSECTION (C)(2) OF THIS SECTION:
(I) AN ATHLETIC OFFICIAL;
(II) A COACH;
(III) SCHOOL PERSONNEL; OR
(IV) A PARENT OR GUARDIAN OF THE STUDENT.
(2) A PERSON MAY NOT ESTABLISH A REGULATION, RULE, POLICY, OR
PRACTICE OR PROVIDE FORMAL, INFORMAL, WRITTEN, OR ORAL GUIDANCE,
INCLUDING ANY PART OF A TRAINING, TO RESTRICT OR DIMINISH AN INDIVIDUAL’S
AUTHORITY UNDER THIS SUBSECTION OR TO DETER AN INDIVIDUAL FROM
LAWFULLY EXERCISING THE INDIVIDUAL’S AUTHORITY UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
[(d)] (E) (1) Before an individual participates in an authorized athletic
activity on school property, the county board shall provide, or require that a third party
provide:
(i) Information on concussions and head injuries to the individual
and, if applicable, a parent or guardian of the individual; and
(ii) Notice that acknowledgment of the receipt of the information by
the individual and, if applicable, the parent or guardian of the individual, is required.
(2) The information required under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall
be in the form of:
(i) A separate information sheet; or

HOUSE BILL 961
(ii) A notice on the registration form for a youth sports program
stating that information on concussion and head injury is available, including directions on
how to receive the information electronically.
(3) The individual and, if applicable, the parent or guardian of the
individual shall:
(i) Acknowledge receipt of the information by:
1. Signature;
2. Checking an acknowledgment box on the registration
form; or
3. Another method of written or electronic acknowledgment;
and
(ii) Return the acknowledgment to the county board or third party.
[(e)] (F) A youth sports program that uses a public school facility shall provide
annually to the county board or the board’s agent a statement of intent to comply for all of
its athletic activities with the requirements for the management of a concussion or other
head injury of a participant under this section.
(G) A PERSON MAY BRING AN ACTION FOR DECLARATORY RELIEF IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THE MARYLAND UNIFORM DECLARATORY JUDGMENTS ACT TO
ENFORCE THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.